Utah statutes.
16-6a-703.   Court-ordered meeting.
(1) (a)  Upon an application described in Subsection (1)(b) the holding of a
meeting of the members may be summarily ordered by:
(i)  the district court of the county in this state where the nonprofit
corporation's principal office is located; or
(ii)  if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state, the
district court in and for Salt Lake County.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies to an application by:
(i)  any voting member entitled to participate in an annual meeting if an
annual meeting was required to be held and was not held within 15 months
after:
(A)  the corporation's last annual meeting; or
(B)  if there has been no annual meeting, the date of incorporation; or
(ii)  any person who participated in a call of or demand for a special meeting
effective under Subsection 16-6a-702(1), if:
(A)  notice of the special meeting was not given within 30 days after:
(I)  the date of the call; or
(II)  the date the last of the demands necessary to require the calling of the
meeting was received by the nonprofit corporation pursuant to Subsection
16-6a-702(1)(b); or
(B)  the special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.
(2)  A court that orders a meeting under Subsection (1) may:
(a)  fix the time and place of the meeting;
(b)  determine the members entitled to participate in the meeting;
(c)  specify a record date for determining members entitled to notice of and
to vote at the meeting;
(d)  prescribe the form and content of the notice of the meeting;
(e) (i)  fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the
meeting; or
(ii)  direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for
action on the specific matters to be considered at the meeting; and
(f)  enter other orders necessary or appropriate to accomplish the holding of
the meeting.
